Alabama, session 2026rs, HB587.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall only apply to Talladega
County.
Section 2. (a)(1) The Talladega County Sheriff's Office
shall collect a service of process fee of fifty dollars ($50)
for service or attempted service of process by the sheriff for
matters pending or to be commenced in a court outside the
State of Alabama.
(2) The Talladega County Sheriff's Office shall collect
a service of process fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for
service or attempted service of process by the sheriff to an
inmate at the federal correctional institution in Talladega
for matters pending or to be commenced in a court outside of
the State of Alabama.
(b) The clerk of the court or other designee in
Talladega County shall collect the service of process fee
designated in subsection (a) and shall remit the fee directly
to the sheriff for deposit in the sheriff's official account.
(c) The sheriff's official account shall be an
additional account separate from the budget of the sheriff as
provided for in the county general fund. The fees deposited
Page 1

provided for in the county general fund. The fees deposited
HB587 Enrolled
into the sheriff's official account shall not diminish,
offset, or take the place of budgeted funds or any other
source of income established for the sheriff or for the
operation of the Talladega County Sheriff's Office. Amounts in
the sheriff's official account may be expended at the
discretion of the sheriff for law enforcement purposes.
(d) The district attorney, law enforcement, grand
juries, Talladega County, and all other counties in the State
of Alabama shall be exempt from payment of the fees provided
for in this act.
Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 3. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB587 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3